District of Columbia statutes.
7-2508.05

Sharing of registration information; Freedom of Information Act exception.

(a)

Gun offender registration information shall not be made available except as authorized under subsection (b) of this section. No gun offender registration information shall be available as a public record under § 2-532.

(b)

The Chief is authorized to make gun offender registration information available to other local, state, or federal government agencies.

Sept. 24, 1976, D.C. Law 1-85, title VIII, § 805
as added Dec. 10, 2009, D.C. Law 18-88, § 205, 56 DCR 7413

History

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 205 of Omnibus Public Safety and Justice Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-227, October 21, 2009, 56 DCR 8668).

Emergency Legislation